North Dakota, session 69, HB1065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 57-51.1-07.8 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. The state treasurer shall distribute the lesser of thirteen percent of the balance of the fund or
sixteen million one hundred thousand dollars to non-oil-producing counties for the benefit of
the organized and unorganized townships within each non-oil-producing county. The
distribution to each non-oil-producing county must provide for an equal allocation to each
organized and unorganized township which is proportional to the number of township road
miles in each organized and unorganized township relative to the combined total township
road miles in all organized and unorganized townships in all non - oi l - producing counties. For
purposes of this subsection, township road miles must be based on certifications provided to
the state treasurer under section 54 - 27 - 19.1 . The amount allocated to organized townships
under this section must be paid by the county treasurer to each organized township. The
amount allocated to unorganized townships under this section must be credited by the county
treasurer to a special fund for unorganized township roads. A township is not eligible for an
allocation of funds under this section if the township does not maintain any township roads.

H. B. NO. 1065 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1065.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 3 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State